inc/V-CLASS_AL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sçáalaa - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AL_STEM_2

     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáalaa
     sçál+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sçáalaan
     sçál+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçáalaas
     sçál+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçáalaa.ang
     sçál+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçáal'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+CERTAIN+PAST: sçáal'ahlanggan
     sçál+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáal'ahlanggiinii
     sçál+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçáal'ahlans
     sçál+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçáalaa'ahlang
     sçál+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçáalaa'ahlanggaa
     sçál+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçáalaa'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+REFLEXIVE: sçáal'ahl
